ja: スクールバスの安全機能: 3点式シートベルト; ABS; バックカメラ; 車内置き去り防止システム; 横断防止アーム (クロッシングゲート); 横滑り防止装置 (ESC); 外装360度カメラ; 自動消火システム; GPS/テレマティクス; ハイバックシート; 後部非常口ドア; ルーフハッチ (非常口); 側面非常口ドア; ストップアーム; ストロボライト; 児童監視カメラ (車内); 車椅子用リフト; 車椅子用スロープ; その他
bg-BG: Функция за безопасност на училищен автобус: 3-точкови предпазни колани; ABS; Камера за задно виждане; Система за проверка на деца; Контролно рамо за пресичане (бариера за пресичане); Електронна система за стабилност; Външни 360-градусови камери; Система за гасене на пожар; GPS/Телематика; Седалки с високи облегалки; Задна врата за авариен изход; Покривни люкове (авариен изход); Странична врата за авариен изход; Знак „Стоп“ на рамо; Мигащи светлини; Камери за наблюдение на ученици (вътрешни); Платформа за инвалидни колички; Рампа за инвалидни колички; Други
hu: Iskolabusz biztonsági jellemzője: 3 pontos biztonsági övek; ABS; Tolatókamera; Gyermekellenőrző rendszer; Átkelésvezérlő kar (átkelőkapu); Elektronikus menetstabilizáló; Külső 360 fokos kamerák; Tűzoltó rendszer; GPS/telematika; Magas háttámlás ülések; Hátsó vészkijárati ajtó; Tetőkibúvók (vészkijárat); Oldalsó vészkijárati ajtó; Stoptábla kar; Villogók; Tanulómegfigyelő kamerák (belső); Kerekesszék-emelő; Kerekesszék-rámpa; Egyéb
es: Característica de seguridad del autobús escolar: Cinturones de seguridad de 3 puntos; ABS; Cámara de marcha atrás; Sistema de verificación de niños; Brazo de control de cruce (barrera de cruce); Control de estabilidad electrónico; Cámaras exteriores 360; Sistema de extinción de incendios; GPS/telemática; Asientos de respaldo alto; Puerta de salida de emergencia trasera; Escotillas de techo (salida de emergencia); Puerta de salida de emergencia lateral; Brazo de pare; Luces estroboscópicas; Cámaras de vigilancia de estudiantes (interior); Elevador de silla de ruedas; Rampa para silla de ruedas; Otro
cs: Bezpečnostní prvek školního autobusu: Tříbodové bezpečnostní pásy; ABS; Couvací kamera; Systém kontroly přítomnosti dětí; Výsuvná bezpečnostní závora; Elektronická kontrola stability (ESC); Vnější 360° kamery; Protipožární systém; GPS/telematika; Sedadla s vysokým opěradlem; Zadní nouzové dveře; Střešní poklopy (nouzový východ); Boční nouzové dveře; Výklopné rameno se značkou Stop; Stroboskopická světla; Kamery pro sledování studentů (vnitřní); Zvedací plošina pro invalidní vozíky; Rampa pro invalidní vozíky; Jiné
fi: Koulubussin turvallisuusominaisuus: 3-pisteturvavyöt; ABS; Peruutuskamera; Matkustajien tarkistusjärjestelmä; Kulkupuomi (suojatiepuomi); Elektroninen ajonvakautusjärjestelmä; Ulkoiset 360-asteen kamerat; Palonsammutusjärjestelmä; GPS/telematiikka; Korkeaselkänojaiset istuimet; Hätäpoistumisovi takana; Kattoluukut (hätäpoistumistie); Hätäpoistumisovi sivulla; Pysäytysvarsi; Strobovalot; Oppilaiden valvontakamerat (sisällä); Pyörätuolinostin; Pyörätuoliramppi; Muu
fr: Dispositif de sécurité du bus scolaire: Ceintures de sécurité à 3 points; ABS; Caméra de recul; Système de vérification des enfants; Bras d'éloignement (barrière de sécurité); Contrôle électronique de la stabilité; Caméras extérieures à 360 degrés; Système d'extinction d'incendie; GPS/télématique; Sièges à dossier haut; Porte de sortie de secours arrière; Trappes de toit (sortie de secours); Porte de sortie de secours latérale; Panneau d'arrêt déployable; Feux stroboscopiques; Caméras de surveillance des élèves (intérieur); Élévateur pour fauteuil roulant; Rampe pour fauteuil roulant; Autre
ro-RO: Caracteristica de siguranță a autobuzului școlar: Centuri de siguranță în 3 puncte; ABS; Cameră pentru marșarier; Sistem de verificare a copiilor; Braț de control al traversării (barieră de traversare); Control electronic al stabilității; Camere exterioare 360; Sistem de stingere a incendiilor; GPS/telematică; Scaune cu spătar înalt; Ușă de ieșire de urgență în spate; Trape pe acoperiș (ieșire de urgență); Ușă de ieșire de urgență laterală; Braț cu indicator Stop; Lumini stroboscopice; Camere de monitorizare a elevilor (interior); Lift pentru scaun cu rotile; Rampă pentru scaun cu rotile; Altele
de: Sicherheitsmerkmal des Schulbusses: 3-Punkt-Sicherheitsgurte; ABS; Rückfahrkamera; Kind-Kontrollsystem; Sicherheitsschranke vorn; Elektronische Stabilitätskontrolle; 360-Grad-Außenkameras; Feuerlöschsystem; GPS/Telematik; Sitze mit hoher Rückenlehne; Hintere Notausgangstür; Dachluken (Notausgang); Seitliche Notausgangstür; Stopp-Schild (ausklappbar); Stroboskoplampen; Überwachungskameras für Schüler:innen (innen); Rollstuhllift; Rollstuhlrampe; Sonstige
zh-TW: 校車安全功能: 三點式安全帶; ABS; 倒車顯影; 兒童確認系統; 橫越控制臂 (橫越閘門); 電子車身穩定控制系統; 外部 360 度攝影機; 滅火系統; GPS/車載資通訊系統; 高椅背座椅; 後方緊急逃生門; 車頂逃生窗 (緊急逃生口); 側邊緊急逃生門; 停車指示牌; 閃光燈; 學生監控攝影機 (內部); 輪椅升降設備; 輪椅坡道; 其他
pt-BR: Ônibus escolar recurso de segurança: Cintos de segurança de 3 pontos; ABS; Câmera de ré; Sistema de verificação de crianças; Braço de controle de travessia (portão de travessia); Controle de estabilidade eletrônico; Câmeras externas 360°; Sistema de supressão de incêndio; GPS/telemática; Assentos com encosto alto; Porta traseira de saída de emergência; Escotilhas de teto (saída de emergência); Porta lateral de saída de emergência; Braço de parada; Luzes estroboscópicas; Câmeras de monitoramento de estudantes (interno); Elevador para cadeira de rodas; Rampa para cadeira de rodas; Outros
ko: 스쿨버스 안전 기능: 3점식 안전벨트; ABS; 후방 카메라; 아동 확인 시스템; 교차 제어 암(크로싱 게이트); 전자식 차체 자세 제어 장치; 외부 360도 카메라; 화재 진압 시스템; GPS/텔레매틱스; 하이백 시트; 후면 비상 탈출구; 루프 해치(비상구); 측면 비상 탈출구; 정지 암; 스트로브 라이트; 학생 모니터링 카메라(내부); 휠체어 리프트; 휠체어 경사로; 기타
da: Skolebus' sikkerhedsfunktion: 3-punkts sikkerhedsseler; ABS; Bakkamera; Kontrolsystem til børn; Krydsningsbom (sikkerhedsbom); Elektronisk stabilitetskontrol; Udvendige 360-kameraer; Brandslukningssystem; GPS/telematik; Sæder med høj ryg; Nødudgangsdør bagtil; Tagluger (nødudgang); Nødudgangsdør i siden; Stoparm; Stroboskoplys; Kameraer til elevovervågning (indvendige); Kørestolslift; Kørestolsrampe; Andet
nb: Sikkerhetsfunksjon for skolebuss: 3-punkts sikkerhetsbelter; ABS; Ryggekamera; Barnesjekksystem; Kryssingskontrollarm; Elektronisk stabilitetskontroll; Utvendige 360-kameraer; Brannslukkingssystem; GPS/telematikk; Seter med høy rygg; Bakre nødutgangsdør; Takluker (nødutgang); Nødutgangsdør på siden; Stopparm; Strobelys; Elevovervåkingskameraer (innvendig); Rullestolheis; Rullestolrampe; Annet
sv: Skolbussens säkerhetsfunktion: Trepunktsbälten; ABS; Backkamera; Barnkontrollsystem; Passagekontrollarm (crossing gate); Elektronisk stabilitetskontroll; Exteriöra 360-graderskameror; Brandsläckningssystem; GPS/telematik; Säten med högt ryggstöd; Bakre nödutgångsdörr; Takluckor (nödutgång); Sidonödutgångsdörr; Stopparm; Blixtljus; Övervakningskameror för elever (interiör); Rullstolslyft; Rullstolsramp; Övrigt
nl: Schoolbus veiligheidskenmerk: Driepuntsgordels; ABS; Achteruitrijcamera; Kindcontrolesysteem; Oversteekslagboom; Elektronische stabiliteitscontrole; Exterieur 360-gradencamera's; Brandblussysteem; Gps/telematica; Stoelen met hoge rugleuning; Nooduitgang achter; Dakluiken (nooduitgang); Nooduitgang zijkant; Stopbord; Flitslampen; Cameratoezicht leerlingen (interieur); Rolstoellift; Rolstoeloprijplaat; Overig
lt-LT: Mokyklinio autobuso saugos funkcija: 3 taškų saugos diržai; ABS; Galinio vaizdo kamera; Vaiko patikros sistema; Perėjos valdymo svirtis (užtvaras); Elektroninė stabilumo kontrolė; Išorinės 360 laipsnių kameros; Gaisro gesinimo sistema; GPS / telematika; Sėdynės su aukštais atlošais; Galinės avarinio išėjimo durys; Stogo liukai (avarinis išėjimas); Šoninės avarinio išėjimo durys; „Stop“ svirtis; Stroboskopiniai žibintai; Mokinių stebėjimo kameros (viduje); Neįgaliųjų vežimėlių keltuvas; Neįgaliųjų vežimėlių rampa; Kita
zh-CN: 校车安全特性: 三点式安全带; ABS; 倒车摄像头; 儿童防遗忘检查系统; 过街控制臂（过街栏杆）; 电子稳定控制系统; 外部 360 度摄像头; 灭火系统; GPS/远程信息处理系统; 高靠背座椅; 后方紧急出口门; 车顶舱口（紧急出口）; 侧方紧急出口门; 停车信号臂; 频闪灯; 学生监控摄像头（车内）; 轮椅升降机; 轮椅坡道; 其他
hr-HR: Sigurnosna značajka školskog autobusa: Sigurnosni pojasevi u 3 točke; ABS; Kamera za vožnju unatrag; Sustav za provjeru prisutnosti djece; Ruka za kontrolu prijelaza (rampa); Elektronička kontrola stabilnosti; Vanjske kamere od 360°; Sustav za gašenje požara; GPS / telematika; Sjedala s visokim naslonom; Stražnja vrata za izlaz u nuždi; Krovni otvori (izlaz u nuždi); Bočna vrata za izlaz u nuždi; Znak Stop na izvlačenje; Stroboskopska svjetla; Kamere za nadzor učenika (unutarnje); Dizalo za invalidska kolica; Rampa za invalidska kolica; Ostalo
pl: Cechy bezpieczeństwa autobusu szkolnego: 3-punktowe pasy bezpieczeństwa; ABS; Kamera cofania; System sprawdzania obecności dzieci; Ramię kontroli przejścia (szlaban); Elektroniczna kontrola stabilności; Zewnętrzne kamery 360 stopni; System przeciwpożarowy; GPS / telematyka; Fotele z wysokim oparciem; Tylne drzwi ewakuacyjne; Włazy dachowe (wyjście ewakuacyjne); Boczne drzwi ewakuacyjne; Ramię znaku stop; Światła stroboskopowe; Kamery do monitorowania uczniów (wewnętrzne); Winda dla wózków inwalidzkich; Rampa dla wózków inwalidzkich; Inne
ru: Функция безопасности школьного автобуса: 3-точечные ремни безопасности; ABS; Камера заднего вида; Система проверки присутствия детей; Выдвижной передний шлагбаум; Электронный контроль устойчивости; Внешние камеры кругового обзора; Система пожаротушения; GPS/телематика; Сиденья с высокой спинкой; Задняя дверь запасного выхода; Люки на крыше (запасной выход); Боковая дверь запасного выхода; Выдвижной знак «Стоп»; Проблесковые маячки; Камеры наблюдения за учениками (внутри салона); Подъёмник для инвалидных колясок; Пандус для инвалидных колясок; Другое
th: คุณสมบัติความปลอดภัยของรถโรงเรียน: เข็มขัดนิรภัยแบบ 3 จุด; ABS; กล้องมองหลัง; ระบบตรวจสอบเด็ก; แขนกั้นทางข้าม (ไม้กั้นทางข้าม); ระบบควบคุมการทรงตัวทางอิเล็กทรอนิกส์; กล้อง 360 องศาภายนอก; ระบบดับเพลิง; GPS/เทเลเมติกส์; เบาะพิงหลังสูง; ประตูทางออกฉุกเฉินด้านหลัง; ช่องหลังคา (ทางออกฉุกเฉิน); ประตูทางออกฉุกเฉินด้านข้าง; ป้ายหยุดรถ; ไฟสโตรบ; กล้องตรวจสอบนักเรียน (ภายใน); ลิฟต์ยกรถเข็น; ทางลาดสำหรับรถเข็น; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Bezpečnostný prvok školského autobusu: 3-bodové bezpečnostné pásy; ABS; Cúvacia kamera; Systém kontroly detí; Bezpečnostná závora (výklopné rameno); Elektronická kontrola stability; Vonkajšie 360° kamery; Systém na hasenie požiaru; GPS/telematika; Sedadlá s vysokým operadlom; Zadné núdzové dvere; Strešné prielezy (núdzový východ); Bočné núdzové dvere; Značka Stop na ramene; Stroboskopické svetlá; Kamery na monitorovanie študentov (interiér); Plošina pre invalidné vozíky; Rampa pre invalidné vozíky; Iné
sl-SI: Varnostna lastnost šolskega avtobusa: 3-točkovni varnostni pasovi; ABS; Kamera za vzvratno vožnjo; Sistem za preverjanje prisotnosti otrok; Prehodna roka (zapornica); Elektronski nadzor stabilnosti; Zunanje 360-stopinjske kamere; Sistem za gašenje požara; GPS/telematika; Sedeži z visokim naslonom; Zadnja vrata za izhod v sili; Strešne lopute (izhod v sili); Stranska vrata za izhod v sili; Opozorilna roka »Stop«; Stroboskopske luči; Kamere za nadzor učencev (notranje); Dvigalo za invalidske vozičke; Klančina za invalidske vozičke; Drugo
en: School bus safety feature: 3-point seat belts; ABS; Back-up camera; Child check system; Crossing control arm (crossing gate); Electronic stability control; Exterior 360 cameras; Fire suppression system; GPS/telematics; High-back seats; Rear emergency exit door; Roof hatches (emergency exit); Side emergency exit door; Stop arm; Strobe lights; Student monitoring cameras (interior); Wheelchair lift; Wheelchair ramp; Other
vi: Tính năng an toàn của xe buýt trường học: Dây an toàn 3 điểm; ABS; Camera lùi; Hệ thống kiểm tra trẻ em; Thanh gạt điều khiển qua đường (cổng qua đường); Hệ thống cân bằng điện tử; Camera 360 độ bên ngoài; Hệ thống chữa cháy; GPS/viễn thông; Ghế tựa lưng cao; Cửa thoát hiểm phía sau; Cửa sập trên nóc (lối thoát hiểm); Cửa thoát hiểm bên hông; Biển báo dừng; Đèn nhấp nháy; Camera giám sát học sinh (bên trong); Thang nâng xe lăn; Dốc cho xe lăn; Khác
el: Χαρακτηριστικό ασφαλείας σχολικού λεωφορείου: Ζώνες ασφαλείας 3 σημείων; ABS; Κάμερα οπισθοπορείας; Σύστημα ελέγχου παιδιών; Βραχίονας ελέγχου διέλευσης (πύλη διέλευσης); Ηλεκτρονικός έλεγχος ευστάθειας; Εξωτερικές κάμερες 360 μοιρών; Σύστημα πυρόσβεσης; GPS/τηλεματική; Καθίσματα με ψηλή πλάτη; Πίσω πόρτα εξόδου κινδύνου; Καταπακτές οροφής (έξοδος κινδύνου); Πλευρική πόρτα εξόδου κινδύνου; Πινακίδα stop; Στροβοσκοπικά φώτα; Κάμερες παρακολούθησης μαθητών (εσωτερικές); Ανυψωτικό αναπηρικού αμαξιδίου; Ράμπα αναπηρικού αμαξιδίου; Άλλο
tr: Okul otobüsü güvenlik özelliği: 3 noktalı emniyet kemerleri; ABS; Geri görüş kamerası; Çocuk kontrol sistemi; Geçiş kontrol kolu (geçiş bariyeri); Elektronik denge kontrolü; 360 derece dış kameralar; Yangın söndürme sistemi; GPS/telematik; Yüksek sırtlı koltuklar; Arka acil çıkış kapısı; Tavan kapakları (acil çıkış); Yan acil çıkış kapısı; Dur işareti kolu; Çakar lambalar; Öğrenci izleme kameraları (iç); Tekerlekli sandalye asansörü; Tekerlekli sandalye rampası; Diğer
it: Dispositivo di sicurezza dello scuolabus: Cinture di sicurezza a 3 punti; ABS; Telecamera posteriore; Sistema di controllo bambini; Braccio di controllo dell’attraversamento (sbarra di attraversamento); Controllo elettronico della stabilità; Telecamere esterne a 360°; Sistema di estinzione incendi; GPS/telematica; Sedili con schienale alto; Porta di emergenza posteriore; Botole sul tetto (uscita di emergenza); Porta di emergenza laterale; Braccio di stop; Luci stroboscopiche; Telecamere di monitoraggio studenti (interne); Sollevatore per sedie a rotelle; Rampa per sedie a rotelle; Altro
pt-PT: Características de segurança do autocarro escolar: Cintos de segurança de 3 pontos; ABS; Câmara de marcha-atrás; Sistema de verificação de crianças; Braço de controlo de travessia (portão de travessia); Controlo eletrónico de estabilidade; Câmaras exteriores 360; Sistema de supressão de incêndios; GPS/telemática; Assentos com encosto alto; Porta de saída de emergência traseira; Escotilhas de tejadilho (saída de emergência); Porta de saída de emergência lateral; Braço de paragem; Luzes estroboscópicas; Câmaras de monitorização de estudantes (interior); Elevador para cadeiras de rodas; Rampa para cadeiras de rodas; Outro